Washington statutes.
RCW 16.67.091

Commission's plans, programs, and projects—Director's approval required.

(1) The commission shall develop and submit to the director for approval any plans, programs, and projects concerning the following:

(a) The establishment, issuance, effectuation, and administration of appropriate programs or projects for the advertising and promotion of its affected commodities;

(b) The establishment, effectuation, and administration of research, education, and programs related to health and safety of cattle, beef, and beef products; and

(c) The establishment and effectuation of market research projects, market development projects, or industry specific educational projects to the end that the marketing and utilization of its affected commodities may be encouraged, expanded, improved, or made more efficient.

(2) The director shall review the commission's advertising or promotion program to ensure that no false claims are being made concerning its affected commodities.

(3) The commission, prior to the beginning of its fiscal year, shall prepare and submit to the director for approval its research plan, its commodity-related education and training plan, and its budget on a fiscal period basis.

(4) The director shall review and make a determination of all submissions described in this section in a timely manner.

[ 2017 c 256 s 3; 2003 c 396 s 34.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 396: See note following RCW 15.66.030.